Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 185.010 is amended to read:
185.010. (1)  The Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office shall be staffed by an [ administrator]
executive director, who is responsible for the performance of  the duties, functions and powers of
the office.
(2) A board consisting of the chairpersons of the commissions served by the office and  the
Governor shall establish the qualifications  for and appoint the [ Administrator of the Oregon Advo-
cacy Commissions Office ] executive director .
(3) The [ Administrator of the  Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office ] executive director  shall
receive a salary as prescribed by law, or as prescribed by the board described in subsection (2) of
this section if a salary is not prescribed by law.
(4) The [ Administrator of the Oregon Advocacy  Commissions Office ] executive director is in the
unclassified  service.
(5) The [ Administrator of the  Oregon Advocacy Commissions Office ] executive director  shall
provide each commission served by the office with the administrative support needed by the  com-
mission to carry out the statutory duties of the commission. Subject  to any applicable provisions
of the State Personnel Relations Law, the [ administrator] executive director shall employ all per-
sons necessary for the operation of the office, prescribe the duties  of those employees and establish
the compensation payable to those employees.
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 790 (SB 790-INTRO) Page 2